Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2,155
Hybrid seed corn, defined; sale; practices forbidden.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, corporation or its agents or representatives to sell, offer or expose for sale, or falsely mark or tag, within the State of Nebraska, any seed corn as hybrid unless it answers to the following definition: Hybrid seed corn shall be seed of the first generation of a cross involving two, three or four different inbred lines of corn or their combinations, and shall be restricted to seed of single crosses, three-way crosses, and double crosses, these in turn being defined as follows:

(1) Single cross: The first generation of a hybrid between two inbred lines;

(2) Three-way cross: The first generation of a hybrid between a single cross and an inbred line;

(3) Double cross: The first generation of a hybrid between two single crosses.

Laws 1937, c. 4, § 1, p. 56;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 81-1823;

R.S.1943, § 81-2,155.